Atelier/dicollect/fr-dicollecte-daily-classique-reforme1990-v2012-12-27.aff
FLAG long
SFX zA Y 53
SFX zA voir voir/n'q'd'l'm't' avoir is:infi
SFX zA voir yant/n'q'l'm't' avoir is:ppre
SFX zA avoir eu avoir is:ppas is:mas is:sg
SFX zA avoir eus avoir is:ppas is:mas is:pl
SFX zA avoir eue avoir is:ppas is:fem is:sg
SFX zA avoir eues avoir is:ppas is:fem is:pl
SFX zA voir i/n'q'j'l't' avoir is:ipre is:1sg
SFX zA voir s/n'q'l'm't' avoir is:ipre is:2sg
SFX zA voir 0/n'q'c'l'm't' avoir is:ipre is:3sg
SFX zA voir vons/n'q'l't' avoir is:ipre is:1pl
SFX zA voir vez/n'q'l'm' avoir is:ipre is:2pl
SFX zA avoir ont/n'q'l'm't' avoir is:ipre is:3pl
SFX zA voir vais/n'q'j'l'm't' avoir is:iimp is:1sg
SFX zA voir vais/n'q'l'm't' avoir is:iimp is:2sg
SFX zA voir vait/n'q'c'l'm't' avoir is:iimp is:3sg
SFX zA voir vions/n'q'l't' avoir is:iimp is:1pl
SFX zA voir viez/n'q'l'm' avoir is:iimp is:2pl
SFX zA voir vaient/n'q'l'm't' avoir is:iimp is:3pl
SFX zA avoir eus/n'q'j'l'm't' avoir is:ipsi is:1sg
SFX zA avoir eus/n'q'l'm't' avoir is:ipsi is:2sg
SFX zA avoir eut/n'q'c'l'm't' avoir is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX zA avoir eûmes/n'q'l't' avoir is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX zA avoir eûtes/n'q'l'm' avoir is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX zA avoir eurent/n'q'l'm't' avoir is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX zA voir urai/n'q'j'l'm't' avoir is:ifut is:1sg
SFX zA voir uras/n'q'l'm't' avoir is:ifut is:2sg
SFX zA voir ura/n'q'l'm't' avoir is:ifut is:3sg
SFX zA voir urons/n'q'l't' avoir is:ifut is:1pl
SFX zA voir urez/n'q'l'm' avoir is:ifut is:2pl
SFX zA voir uront/n'q'l'm't' avoir is:ifut is:3pl
SFX zA voir urais/n'q'j'l'm't' avoir is:cond is:1sg
SFX zA voir urais/n'q'l'm't' avoir is:cond is:2sg
SFX zA voir urait/n'q'l'm't' avoir is:cond is:3sg
SFX zA voir urions/n'q'l't' avoir is:cond is:1pl
SFX zA voir uriez/n'q'l'm' avoir is:cond is:2pl
SFX zA voir uraient/n'q'l'm't' avoir is:cond is:3pl
SFX zA voir ie/n'j'l'm't' avoir is:spre is:1sg
SFX zA voir ies/n'l'm't' avoir is:spre is:2sg
SFX zA voir it/n'q'l'm't' avoir is:spre is:3sg
SFX zA voir yons/n'l't' avoir is:spre is:1pl
SFX zA voir yez/n'l'm' avoir is:spre is:2pl
SFX zA voir ient/n'q'l'm't' avoir is:spre is:3pl
SFX zA avoir eusse/n'q'j'l'm't' avoir is:simp is:1sg
SFX zA avoir eussé avoir is:simp is:1sg
SFX zA avoir eussè avoir is:simp is:1sg
SFX zA avoir eusses/n'q'l'm't' avoir is:simp is:2sg
SFX zA avoir eût/n'q'c'l'm't' avoir is:simp is:3sg
SFX zA avoir eussions/n'q'l't' avoir is:simp is:1pl
SFX zA avoir eussiez/n'q'l'm' avoir is:simp is:2pl
SFX zA avoir eussent/n'q'l'm't' avoir is:simp is:3pl
SFX zA voir ie/n' avoir is:impe is:2sg
SFX zA voir yons/n' avoir is:impe is:1pl
SFX zA voir yez/n' avoir is:impe is:2pl
SFX zE Y 50
SFX zE tre tre/n'q'd'l'm't's' être is:infi
SFX zE être étant/n'q'l'm't's' être is:ppre
SFX zE être été être is:ppas is:epi is:inv
SFX zE être suis être is:ipre is:1sg
SFX zE être es/n'q'l'm't' être is:ipre is:2sg
SFX zE être est/n'q'c'l'm't's' être is:ipre is:3sg
SFX zE être sommes être is:ipre is:1pl
SFX zE tre tes/n'q'l'm' être is:ipre is:2pl
SFX zE être sont être is:ipre is:3pl
SFX zE être étais/n'q'j'l'm't' être is:iimp is:1sg
SFX zE être étais/n'q'l'm't' être is:iimp is:2sg
SFX zE être était/n'q'c'l'm't's' être is:iimp is:3sg
SFX zE être étions/n'q'l't' être is:iimp is:1pl
SFX zE être étiez/n'q'l'm' être is:iimp is:2pl
SFX zE être étaient/n'q'c'l'm't's' être is:iimp is:3pl
SFX zE être fus être is:ipsi is:1sg
SFX zE être fus être is:ipsi is:2sg
SFX zE être fut être is:ipsi is:3sg
SFX zE être fûmes être is:ipsi is:1pl
SFX zE être fûtes être is:ipsi is:2pl
SFX zE être furent être is:ipsi is:3pl
SFX zE être serai être is:ifut is:1sg
SFX zE être seras être is:ifut is:2sg
SFX zE être sera être is:ifut is:3sg
SFX zE être serons être is:ifut is:1pl
SFX zE être serez être is:ifut is:2pl
SFX zE être seront être is:ifut is:3pl
SFX zE être serais être is:cond is:1sg
SFX zE être serais être is:cond is:2sg
SFX zE être serait être is:cond is:3sg
SFX zE être serions être is:cond is:1pl
SFX zE être seriez être is:cond is:2pl
SFX zE être seraient être is:cond is:3pl
SFX zE être sois être is:spre is:1sg
SFX zE être sois être is:spre is:2sg
SFX zE être soit être is:spre is:3sg
SFX zE être soyons être is:spre is:1pl
SFX zE être soyez être is:spre is:2pl
SFX zE être soient être is:spre is:3pl
SFX zE être fusse être is:simp is:1sg
SFX zE être fussé être is:simp is:1sg
SFX zE être fussè être is:simp is:1sg
SFX zE être fusses être is:simp is:2sg
SFX zE être fût être is:simp is:3sg
SFX zE être fussions être is:simp is:1pl
SFX zE être fussiez être is:simp is:2pl
SFX zE être fussent être is:simp is:3pl
SFX zE être sois être is:impe is:2sg
SFX zE être soyons être is:impe is:1pl
SFX zE être soyez être is:impe is:2pl
